Florida, session 2026, SB690.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (d) of subsection (9) of section 14 1002.394, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 1002.394âThe Family Empowerment Scholarship Program.â 16 (9)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âTo be 17 eligible to participate in the Family Empowerment Scholarship 18 Program, a private school may be sectarian or nonsectarian and 19 must: 20 (d)âBefore a studentâs initial enrollment, provide to the 21 parent in writing For a student determined eligible pursuant to 22 paragraph (3)(b), discuss the schoolâs academic programs and 23 policies, specialized services, code of conduct, and attendance 24 policies, and specialized services and therapies offered at the 25 school. A private school may update the specialized services and 26 therapies offered once per school year or if the school district 27 updates its list of equitable services offered, whichever comes 28 first. In addition, within 30 days after the school district 29 provides the student with a private school services plan, each 30 parent of a student with an individualized education plan, 31 education plan, English language learner plan, or 504 plan must 32 be informed of what modifications, accommodations, and therapies 33 included in the studentâs plan will be honored before enrollment 34 with the parent to determine which programs and services may 35 meet the studentâs individual needs. 36 37 If a private school fails to meet the requirements of this 38 subsection or s. 1002.421, the commissioner may determine that 39 the private school is ineligible to participate in the 40 scholarship program. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.